Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.4 Permanent Joint Committee on Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions
22-7.4-120.
Monsignor Carlo Montecalvo Square.

The intersection of George Waterman Road and Greenville Avenue located in the town of Johnston shall be known as “Monsignor Carlo Montecalvo Square.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 344, § 1.

22-7.4-121.
Pawtucket River Bridge.

The newly reconstructed Rhode Island Bridge No. 550, located on Route 95 in the city of Pawtucket shall hereafter be named and known as the Pawtucket River Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 426, § 1.

22-7.4-122.
The Honorable Raymond M. Durfee Bridge.

The Pocasset River Bridge No. 23, located on Reservoir Avenue in the city of Cranston, shall hereafter be named and known as “The Honorable Raymond M. Durfee Bridge” in recognition of his service and many contributions to the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 382, § 1.

22-7.4-123.
Second Lieutenant Matthew Coutu Memorial Bridge.

The West Davisville Road Bridge in North Kingstown (DOT bridge # 100601) shall be named and known as the “Second Lieutenant Matthew Coutu Memorial Bridge.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 122, § 1.

22-7.4-124.
The John J. Wrenn Building.

Building 71 located in the Pastore Complex in the city of Cranston, shall hereafter be named and known as “The John Wrenn Building” in honor of the former Speaker of the Rhode Island House of Representatives, John Wrenn, who championed the people of this state for fair housing and employment laws; and in recognition of his outstanding leadership and myriad contributions to the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 499, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 537, § 1.

22-7.4-125.
John Grandin IEP House.

The International Engineering Program House, located on Upper College Road at the University of Rhode Island in Kingston, shall hereafter be named and known as “The John Grandin IEP House.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 47, § 1.

22-7.4-126.
Richard E. Beaupre Center.

The new center for Chemical and Forensic Sciences, located on Flagg Road at the University of Rhode Island in Kingston, shall hereafter be named and known as “The Richard E. Beaupre Center for Chemical and Forensic Sciences.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 49, § 1.

22-7.4-127.
The PFC Allan B. McCutcheon and PFC James A. Blanchard Memorial Bridge.

The bridge located on Route 102 and Branch River in the town of Burrillville known as Bridge #672, shall hereafter be named and known as “The PFC Allan B. McCutcheon and PFC James A. Blanchard Memorial Bridge” in recognition of their service and sacrifice to this nation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 57, § 1.

22-7.4-128.
The “Gary M. Penfield Hall.”

The high-rise residence hall, located in the student residential sector of campus at Rhode Island College in Providence, shall hereafter be named and known as “Gary M. Penfield Hall.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 70, § 1.

22-7.4-129.
The Carol J. Guardo Hall.

The school of social work building, located on east campus of Rhode Island College in Providence, shall hereafter be named and known as “Carol J. Guardo Hall.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 69, § 1.

22-7.4-130.
The 1st Sergeant P. Andrew McKenna Memorial Highway.

Route 114, located in the towns of Bristol and Warren between the Warren Bridge and the Mount Hope Bridge, shall also be known by the honorary name of the “1st Sergeant P. Andrew McKenna Memorial Highway” in memory of 1st Sergeant P. Andrew McKenna.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 10, § 1.

22-7.4-131.
The Barrington Veterans Memorial Bridge.

The bridge known as Central Bridge and also known as White Church Bridge in the town of Barrington shall hereafter be named and known as the “Barrington Veterans’ Memorial Bridge.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 42, § 1.

22-7.4-132.
The Mayor James E. Doyle Bridge.

The bridge located on Route 95 and the Pawtucket River in the city of Pawtucket known as the Pawtucket River Bridge, #550, shall hereafter be named and known as “The Mayor James E. Doyle Pawtucket River Bridge” in honor of Mayor Doyle’s lifetime commitment to the city of Pawtucket.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 43, § 1.

22-7.4-133.
Paramaz Avedisian ‘54 Hall.

The College of Pharmacy building on Greenhouse Road at the University of Rhode Island in Kingston, shall hereafter be named and known as “Paramaz Avedisian ‘54 Hall.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 96, § 1.

22-7.4-134.
S. Michael Minutelli Memorial Conference Room.

One of the two (2) conference rooms in the new Rhode Island Veterans’ Home in Bristol shall be named and known as the “S. Michael Minutelli Memorial Conference Room.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 235, § 1.

22-7.4-135.
1st Sergeant P. Andrew McKenna US Army 7th Special Forces Group Memorial Conference Room.

One of the two (2) conference rooms in the new Rhode Island Veterans’ Home shall be named and known as the “1st Sergeant P. Andrew McKenna US Army 7th Special Forces Group Memorial Conference Room.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 236, § 1.

22-7.4-136.
Michael B. Isaacs Roundabout.

The roundabout at the intersection of Division Road and New England Tech Boulevard in the town of East Greenwich shall hereafter be named and known as the “Michael B. Isaacs Roundabout.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 295, § 1.

22-7.4-137.
Michael Andrade Memorial Recreation Room.

The recreation room in the new Rhode Island Veterans Home in Bristol shall be named and known as the “Michael Andrade Memorial Recreation Room.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 26, § 1.

22-7.4-138.
Robert J. Higgins Welcome Center.

The new welcome center located on Upper College Road at the University of Rhode Island in Kingston, shall hereafter be named and known as the “Robert J. Higgins Welcome Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 34, § 1.

22-7.4-139.
Attorney General Julius C. Michaelson Customer Service Center.

The building at 4 Howard Avenue in the city of Cranston shall hereafter be named and known as the “Attorney General Julius C. Michaelson Customer Service Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 216, § 1; PL. 2018, ch. 269, § 1.

22-7.4-140.
Bernard “Bernie” Frezza, Jr. Junction.

The intersection of Hartford Avenue and Reservoir Avenue in the town of Johnston shall be named in honor of Bernard “Bernie” Frezza, Jr.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 80, § 1.

22-7.4-141.
The Fascitelli Center for Advance Engineering.

The college of engineering building, located on Upper College Road at the University of Rhode Island in Kingston, shall hereafter be named and known as the “Fascitelli Center for Advanced Engineering.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 152, § 1.

22-7.4-142.
The Gold Star Family Highway.

The stretch of route 102 known as Chopmist Hill Road, from Route 44 in Chepachet to the southern boundary of the town of Glocester, shall be assigned the honorary name “Gold Star Family Highway.” The honorary name “Gold Star Family Highway” shall be only identified by signage installed on the above-named stretch of highway. The existing official name and route numbers in effect at the time of enactment of this section shall not be changed or affected in any way by the honorary naming of this stretch of highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 133, § 1.

22-7.4-143.
The Rhode Island Purple Heart Trail.

The section of highway known as Route 4 and Route 1, which begins in Warwick as Route 4 and merges into Route 1 in North Kingstown and further extends to the town of Westerly, shall be named The Rhode Island Purple Heart Trail. Provided, this designation shall be coextensive with and shall not repeal, revoke, or displace any name or similar designation already given to sections or areas of and along the highway, and those names and designations shall remain in effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 16, § 1.

22-7.4-144.
Holley Landing.

The landing in South Kingstown originally known as Wordens Pond Landing shall hereafter be named and known as “Holley Landing.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 25, § 1, effective May 27, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 26, § 1, effective May 28, 2021.

22-7.4-145.
Larry Mouradjian fishing pier.

The fishing pier at Rocky Point state park in Warwick shall hereafter be named and known as the “Larry Mouradjian fishing pier.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 53, § 1, effective June 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 54, § 1, effective June 14, 2021.

22-7.4-146.
E. Richard Durfee Road.

The portion of Sand Hill Cove Road in Narragansett bounded to the south by Narragansett assessor’s lots I-G-71-2, I-G-72, I-G-73, and I-G-74 shall be known as “E. Richard Durfee Road.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

22-7.4-147.
Delekta’s Corner.

The corner of 496 Main Street and Joyce Street, along state route 114 in the town of Warren, Rhode Island, shall be known as Delekta’s Corner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 12, § 1, effective April 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 14, § 1, effective April 20, 2022.

22-7.4-148.
James P. McCarvill Boardroom.

The Rhode Island Convention Center boardroom shall be known as the James P. McCarvill Boardroom.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 61, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 62, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.